test/src/gt-norm-yamls/smj-tests-from-old-infra_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: smj/bin/smj-gen.hfst
    Morph: smj/bin/smj.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: smj/bin/ismj-norm.fst
    Morph: smj/bin/smj-norm.fst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - biedna: # -a stem, root vowel -ie-, cons. gradation -dn-/-n-
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom: biedna
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen: biena
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc: bienav
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill: biednaj
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine: bienan
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela: bienas
    biedna+N+Sg+Com: bienajn
    biedna+N+Pl+Nom: biena
    biedna+N+Pl+Gen: bienaj
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc: bienajt
    biedna+N+Pl+Ill: bienajda
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine: bienajn
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela: bienajs
    biedna+N+Pl+Com: bienaj
    biedna+N+Ess: biednan
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: biednam
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: bienam
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: bienam
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: biednasim
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: [bienanam, bienanim]
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: [bienastam, bienastim]
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: [bienajnam, bienajnim]
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [bienajdam, bienajdim]
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: [bienajnam, bienajnim]
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [bienajstam, bienajstim]
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: biednat
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: bienat
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: bienat
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: biednasit
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: [bienanat, bienanit]
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: [bienastat, bienastit]
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: [bienajnat, bienajnit]
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [bienajdat, bienajdit]
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: [bienajnat, bienajnit]
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [bienajstat, bienajstit]
    # biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: biednas
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: bienas
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: bienas
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: biednasis
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: bienanis
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: bienastis
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: bienajnis
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: bienajdis
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: bienajnis
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: bienajstis
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: biednama
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bienama
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: bienama
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu1: biednasimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu1: bienanimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu1: bienastimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxDu1: bienajnimme
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: bienajdimme
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu1: bienajnimme
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu1: bienajstimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: biednada
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: bienada
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: bienada
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu2: biednasihtte
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu2: bienanihtte
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu2: bienastihtte
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxDu2: bienajnihtte
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: bienajdihtte
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu2: bienajnihtte
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu2: bienajstihtte
    # biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: biednaska
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: bienaska
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: bienaska
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxDu3: biednasiska
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxDu3: bienaniska
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxDu3: bienastiska
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxDu3: bienajniska
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: bienajdiska
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxDu3: bienajniska
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxDu3: bienajstiska
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: biednama
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: bienama
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: bienama
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: biednasimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: bienanimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: bienastimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: bienajnimme
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: bienajdimme
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: bienajnimme
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: bienajstimme
    biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: biednada
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: bienada
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: bienada
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: biednasihtte
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: bienanihtte
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: bienastihtte
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: bienajnihtte
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: bienajdihtte
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: bienajnihtte
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: bienajstihtte
    # biedna+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: biednasa
    biedna+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: bienasa
    biedna+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: bienasa
    biedna+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: biednasisá
    biedna+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: bienanisá
    biedna+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: bienastisá
    biedna+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: bienajnisá
    biedna+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: bienajdisá
    biedna+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: bienajnisá
    biedna+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: bienajstisá
